New Jersey, session 222, S1551.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   N.J.S.2C:35-5 is amended to read as follows: 2C:35-5.     Manufacturing, Distributing or Dispensing. a. Except as authorized by P.L.1970, c.226 (C.24:21-1 et seq.), it shall be unlawful for any person knowingly or purposely: (1)   To manufacture, distribute or dispense, or to possess or have under his control with intent to manufacture, distribute or dispense, a controlled dangerous substance or controlled substance analog; or (2)   To create, distribute, or possess or have under his control with intent to distribute, a counterfeit controlled dangerous substance. b.    Any person who violates subsection a. with respect to: (1)   (a)  Heroin, or its analog, in a quantity of 2.5 ounces or more including any adulterants or dilutants; or (b) coca leaves and any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation of coca leaves, and any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation thereof which is chemically equivalent or identical with any of these substances, or analogs, except that the substances shall not include decocainized coca leaves or extractions which do not contain cocaine or ecogine, or 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine or 3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine, in a quantity of five ounces or more including any adulterants or dilutants is guilty of a crime of the first degree. [The] (c)        Upon conviction for an offense described in subparagraph (a) or (b) of this paragraph, the defendant shall, except as provided in N.J.S.2C:35-12, be sentenced to a term of imprisonment by the court.  The term of imprisonment shall include the imposition of a minimum term which shall be fixed at, or between, one-third and one-half of the sentence imposed, during which the defendant shall be ineligible for parole.  Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection a. of N.J.S.2C:43-3, a fine of up to $500,000 may be imposed; (2)   [A] (a)            Heroin or its analog, in a quantity of 0.17 ounces or more but less than 2.5 ounces including any adulterants or dilutants; or (b)   any other substance referred to in subparagraph (b) of paragraph (1) of this subsection, in a quantity of one-half ounce or more but less than five ounces, including any adulterants or dilutants is guilty of a crime of the second degree; (3)   [A] (a) Heroin or its analog, in a quantity of less than 0.17 ounces including any adulterants or dilutants; or (b)   any other substance referred to in subparagraph (b) of paragraph (1) of this subsection in a quantity less than one-half ounce including any adulterants or dilutants is guilty of a crime of the third degree [except that, notwithstanding] ; Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection b. of N.J.S.2C:43-3, upon conviction for an offense described in subparagraph (a) or (b) of this paragraph, a fine of up to $75,000 may be imposed; (4)   A substance classified as a narcotic drug in Schedule I or II other than those specifically covered in this section, or the analog of any such substance, in a quantity of one ounce or more including any adulterants or dilutants is guilty of a crime of the second degree; (5)   A substance classified as a narcotic drug in Schedule I or II other than those specifically covered in this section, or the analog of any such substance, in a quantity of less than one ounce including any adulterants or dilutants is guilty of a crime of the third degree except that, notwithstanding the provisions of subsection b. of N.J.S.2C:43-3, a fine of up to $75,000 may be imposed; (6)   Lysergic acid diethylamide, or its analog, in a quantity of 100 milligrams or more including any adulterants or dilutants, or phencyclidine, or its analog, in a quantity of 10 grams or more including any adulterants or dilutants, is guilty of a crime of the first degree. Except as provided in N.J.S.2C:35-12, the court shall impose a term of imprisonment which shall include the imposition of a minimum term, fixed at, or between, one-third and one-half of the sentence imposed by the court, during which the defendant shall be ineligible for parole. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection a. of N.J.S.2C:43-3, a fine of up to $500,000 may be imposed; (7)   Lysergic acid diethylamide, or its analog, in a quantity of less than 100 milligrams including any adulterants or dilutants, or where the amount is undetermined, or phencyclidine, or its analog, in a quantity of less than 10 grams including any adulterants or dilutants, or where the amount is undetermined, is guilty of a crime of the second degree; (8)   Methamphetamine, or its analog, or phenyl-2-propanone (P2P), in a quantity of five ounces or more including any adulterants or dilutants is guilty of a crime of the first degree. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection a. of N.J.S.2C:43-3, a fine of up to $300,000 may be imposed; (9)   (a) Methamphetamine, or its analog, or phenyl-2-propanone (P2P), in a quantity of one-half ounce or more but less than five ounces including any adulterants or dilutants is guilty of a crime of the second degree; (b)   Methamphetamine, or its analog, or phenyl-2-propanone (P2P), in a quantity of less than one-half ounce including any adulterants or dilutants is guilty of a crime of the third degree except that notwithstanding the provisions of subsection b. of N.J.S.2C:43-3, a fine of up to $75,000 may be imposed; (10) (a) Marijuana in a quantity of 25 pounds or more including any adulterants or dilutants, or 50 or more marijuana plants, regardless of weight, or hashish in a quantity of five pounds or more including any adulterants or dilutants, is guilty of a crime of the first degree.  Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection a. of N.J.S.2C:43-3, a fine of up to $300,000 may be imposed; (b)   Marijuana in a quantity of five pounds or more but less than 25 pounds including any adulterants or dilutants, or 10 or more but fewer than 50 marijuana plants, regardless of weight, or hashish in a quantity of one pound or more but less than five pounds, including any adulterants and dilutants, is guilty of a crime of the second degree; (11) (a) Prior to the effective date of P.L.2021, c.19 (C.2C:35-23.1 et al.), marijuana in a quantity of one ounce or more but less than five pounds including any adulterants or dilutants, or hashish in a quantity of five grams or more but less than one pound including any adulterants or dilutants, is guilty of a crime of the third degree except that, notwithstanding the provisions of subsection b. of N.J.S.2C:43-3, a fine of up to $25,000 may be imposed; (b)   On and after the effective date of P.L.2021, c.19 (C.2C:35-23.1 et al.), marijuana in a quantity of more than one ounce but less than five pounds including any adulterants or dilutants, or hashish in a quantity of more than five grams but less than one pound including any adulterants or dilutants, is guilty of a crime of the third degree except that, notwithstanding the provisions of subsection b. of N.J.S.2C:43-3, a fine of up to $25,000 may be imposed; (12) (a) Prior to the effective date of P.L.2021, c.19 (C.2C:35-23.1 et al.), marijuana in a quantity of less than one ounce including any adulterants or dilutants, or hashish in a quantity of less than five grams including any adulterants or dilutants, is guilty of a crime of the fourth degree; (b)   On and after the effective date of P.L.2021, c.19 (C.2C:35-23.1 et al.), marijuana in a quantity of one ounce or less including any adulterants or dilutants, or hashish in a quantity of five grams or less including any adulterants or dilutants, is, for a first offense, subject to a written warning, which also indicates that any subsequent violation is a crime punishable by a term of imprisonment, a fine, or both, and for a second or subsequent offense, is guilty of a crime of the fourth degree; (i)    The odor of marijuana or hashish, or burnt marijuana or hashish, shall not constitute reasonable articulable suspicion to initiate a search of a person to determine a violation of subparagraph (b) of paragraph (12) of this subsection.  A person who violates this subparagraph shall not be subject to arrest, detention, or otherwise be taken into custody, unless the person is being arrested, detained, or otherwise taken into custody for also committing another violation of law for which that action is legally permitted or required; (ii)   A person shall not be deprived of any legal or civil right, privilege, benefit, or opportunity provided pursuant to any law solely by reason of committing a violation of subparagraph (b) of paragraph (12) of this subsection, nor shall committing one or more violations modify any legal or civil right, privilege, benefit, or opportunity provided pursuant to any law, including, but not limited to, the granting, renewal, forfeiture, or denial of a license, permit, or certification, qualification for and the receipt, alteration, continuation, or denial of any form of financial assistance, housing assistance, or other social services, rights of or custody by a biological parent, or adoptive or foster parent, or other legal guardian of a child or newborn infant, or pregnant woman, in any action or proceeding by the Division of Child Protection and Permanency in the Department of Children and Families, or qualification, approval, or disapproval to serve as a foster parent or other legal guardian; (iii) All local and county law enforcement authorities shall, following the submission process used for the uniform crime reporting system established by P.L.1966, c.37 (C.52:17B-5.1 et seq.), submit a quarterly report to the Uniform Crime Reporting Unit, within the Division of State Police in the Department of Law and Public Safety, or to another designated recipient determined by the Attorney General, containing the number of violations of subparagraph (b) of paragraph (12) of this subsection committed within their respective jurisdictions, plus the race, ethnicity, gender, and age of each person committing a violation, and the disposition of each person's violation.  These violations and associated information, along with a quarterly summary of violations investigated, and associated information collected, by the Division of State Police for the same period shall be summarized by county and municipality in an annual report, and both quarterly summaries and annual reports shall be made available at no cost to the public on the Division of State Police's Internet website; (13) Any other controlled dangerous substance classified in Schedule I, II, III or IV, or its analog, is guilty of a crime of the third degree, except that, notwithstanding the provisions of subsection b. of N.J.S.2C:43-3, a fine of up to $25,000 may be imposed; or (14) Any Schedule V substance, or its analog, is guilty of a crime of the fourth degree except that, notwithstanding the provisions of subsection b. of N.J.S.2C:43-3, a fine of up to $25,000 may be imposed. c.     Where the degree of the offense for violation of this section depends on the quantity of the substance, the quantity involved shall be determined by the trier of fact, other than with respect to a first violation of subparagraph (b) of paragraph (12) of subsection b. of this section which is subject to a written warning as set forth in that subparagraph.  Where the indictment or accusation so provides, the quantity involved in individual acts of manufacturing, distribution, dispensing or possessing with intent to distribute may be aggregated in determining the grade of the offense, whether distribution or dispensing is to the same person or several persons, provided that each individual act of manufacturing, distribution, dispensing or possession with intent to distribute was committed within the applicable statute of limitations. (cf: P.L.2021, c.19, s.1) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.